Maryland, session 2026, SB0336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Chapter 793 of the Acts of 2024
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section, “natural psychedelic substances” includes naturally
derived psilocybin, psilocin, dimethyltryptamine, mescaline, and any other substance
determined by the Task Force to be a natural psychedelic substance.
(2) “Natural psychedelic substances” does not include peyote.
(b) There is a Task Force on Responsible Use of Natural Psychedelic Substances.
(c) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland who shall be appointed by the
President of the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates who shall be appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
(3) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
– 1 –

Ch. 208 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Director of the Maryland Cannabis Administration, or the
Director’s designee; and
(7) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of the University System of Maryland, the
Johns Hopkins University’s Center for Psychedelic and Consciousness Research, or
Sheppard Pratt;
(ii) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF A HISTORICALLY BLACK
COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY IN THE STATE;
(III) one representative of a Native American tribe with experience in
the religious and spiritual use of psychedelic substances;
(iii) (IV) one individual with expertise in behavioral health;
(iv) (V) one individual with expertise in the treatment of
substance use disorders;
(v) (VI) one individual with expertise in the treatment of chronic
pain;
(vi) (VII) one individual with expertise in psychedelic–assisted
psychotherapy;
(vii) (VIII) one individual with expertise in psychedelic research;
(viii) (IX) one individual with expertise in access to care in
underserved communities;
(ix) (X) one individual with expertise in drug policy reform;
(x) (XI) one individual with expertise as a member of law
enforcement;
(xi) (XII) one individual who is a patient with conditions that can be
treated with psychedelic substances;
(xii) (XIII) one individual with experience with the pharmacology of
natural psychedelic substances; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 208
(xiii) (XIV) one physician with experience with the appropriate use of
psychedelic substances and other integrative medical practices.
(d) To the extent practicable, the membership of the Task Force shall reflect the
socioeconomic, ethnic, and geographic diversity of the State.
(e) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Task Force.
(f) The Maryland Cannabis Administration shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(g) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(h) The Task Force shall:
(1) study:
(i) existing laws, policies, and practices relating to the use of natural
psychedelic substances;
(ii) the best available science and data on public benefits of
responsible access to and use of natural psychedelic substances;
(iii) opportunities to maximize public benefits of responsible access to
and use of natural psychedelic substances;
(iv) the best available data on potential risks of access to and use of
natural psychedelic substances;
(v) opportunities to mitigate potential risks of access to and use of
natural psychedelic substances; and
(vi) barriers health care practitioners and facilitators may encounter
relating to natural psychedelic substances, including barriers relating to insurance,
restrictions by licensing and credentialing entities, zoning, advertising, and financial
services;
(2) make recommendations regarding any changes to State law, policy, and
practices needed to create a Maryland Natural Psychedelic Substance Access Program that
enables broad, equitable, and affordable access to psychedelic substances, including:
– 3 –

Ch. 208 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) permitting requirements, including requirements regarding
education and safety;
(ii) access to treatment and regulated support; and
(iii) production of natural psychedelic substances; and
(3) make recommendations to transition from criminalizing conduct
involving natural psychedelic substances, including:
(i) punishing with civil penalties nonviolent infractions involving
the planting, cultivating, purchasing, transporting, distributing, or possessing of or other
engagement with natural psychedelic substances;
(ii) expunging the records of Marylanders with convictions for
nonviolent criminal offenses relating to natural psychedelic substances; and
(iii) releasing Marylanders incarcerated for nonviolent criminal
offenses relating to natural psychedelic substances.
(i) The Task Force may consult with experts and stakeholders in conducting its
duties.
(j) (1) On or before July 31, 2025, the Task Force shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
(2) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 31, 2026, THE TASK FORCE SHALL
SUBMIT AN UPDATED REPORT OF ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2024. It shall remain effective for a period of [2] 3 years and 6 months and, at the end of
December 31, [2026] 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 4 –